src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
!! # Adjectives
!! [Original file](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc)

LEXICON adjectives
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains 3 adjs.
čoma+A:čoma A_  "kaunis" ;
rusked+A:ruskedA1 A_RUSKED  "punainen" ;
uzʼ+A:ud A_UZ  "uusi" ;
